Hawaii statutes.
§451A-2 License required. It shall be
unlawful for any person not licensed under this chapter to engage in the sale
or practice of dealing and fitting of hearing aids or to use any sign, card, or
device to indicate that the person is licensed.

Any person wishing to obtain a license or a
license by endorsement shall apply on a form prescribed by the director and
shall furnish to the director:

(1) Satisfactory proof that the person is a high
school graduate; and

(2) Satisfactory proof that the person has fulfilled
all of the requirements for a license.

An applicant shall be required to pass a
licensing examination. [L 1969, c 205, pt of §1; am L 1985, c 15, §2; am L
1986, c 25, §2; am L 1991, c 29, §1; am L 1992, c 202, §91; am L 1997, c 88,
§3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next